West Virginia, session 2025, SB609.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3B. TRESPASS. §61-3B-4. Trespass on student residence premises or student facility premises of an institution of higher education. (a) For the purposes of this section:(1) "Residence hall" "Premises" means housing or a unit of housing provided primarily for students as a temporary or permanent dwelling place or abode and any property owned, operated, leased, or controlled by an institution of higher education.(2) "Student facility" means a facility owned, operated or controlled by an institution of higher education at which alcoholic liquor or nonintoxicating beer is purchased, sold or served to students enrolled at such institution, but does not include facilities at which athletic events are regularly scheduled and an admission fee is generally charged.(3) " State Institution of higher education" means any state university, state college or state community college under the control, supervision and management of the West Virginia board of trustees or West Virginia board of directors, or any other university, college or institution of higher education in the state subject to rules for accreditation under the provisions of section seven, article four, chapter eighteen-b of this code has the same meaning as ascribed in §18B-1-2 of this code.(4) "Person authorized to have access to a residence hall or student facility" means:(A) A student who resides or dwells in the residence hall; or(B) An invited guest of a student who resides or dwells in the residence hall; or(C) A parent, guardian or person who has legal custody of a student who resides or dwells in the residence hall; or(D) An employee of the institution of higher education who is required by such employment by such institution to be in the residence hall or student facility and who is acting within the scope of his or her employment; or(E) A delivery person, repair person or other such person who is not an employee of the institution of higher education but who nonetheless has a legitimate commercial reason to be in the residence hall or student facility and who is acting pursuant to such legitimate commercial reason.(b) If a person authorized to have access to a residence hall or a student facility enters such residence hall or student facility and by such presence or acts interferes with the peaceful or orderly operation of such residence hall or student facility, such person may be asked to leave such residence hall or student facility. If a person not authorized to have access to a residence hall or student facility enters such a residence hall or student facility, that person may be asked to leave such residence hall or student facility notwithstanding the fact that he or she has not interfered with the peaceful or orderly operation of such residence hall or student facility or otherwise committed a breach of the peace or violated any statute or ordinance. Such request to leave may be made by the president or other administrative head of the institution of higher education, an employee designated by the president to maintain order in the residence hall or student facility, a campus police officer appointed pursuant to the provisions of section five, article four, chapter eighteen-b of this code, or a municipal police officer, a sheriff or deputy sheriff, or a member of the West Virginia state police Upon conviction of a person of a violation of §61-3B-2 or §61-3B-3 of this code when the structure, conveyance, or property is under the authority, care, custody, or control of a state institution of higher education, in addition to sentencing in accordance therewith, a court may enter an order prohibiting the person from being present on the property or premises of the state institution of higher education.(c) It shall be unlawful for a person to remain in a residence hall or student facility after being asked to leave as provided for in subsection (b) of this section.(d) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (c) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined $15. For any second or subsequent conviction for a violation occurring within one year after a previous violation for similar conduct, such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed $100.(e) This section shall not be construed to be in derogation of the common law, nor shall the provisions of this section contravene or infringe upon existing statutes related to the same subject.